apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
	<pardef n="آ__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ؤنگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤنگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ییں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ییں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تیں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کر</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	 </pardef>

	<e lm="چکرا"><i>چکرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹکرا"><i>ٹکرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈگمگا"><i>ڈگمگا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="نہا"><i>نہا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پچھتا"><i>پچھتا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="فہرا"><i>فہرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لڑکھڑا"><i>لڑکھڑا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سستا"><i>سستا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چلا"><i>چلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھبرا"><i>گھبرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جگمگا"><i>جگمگا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھنجھلا"><i>جھنجھلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="تلملا"><i>تلملا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مرجھا"><i>مرجھا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لہرا"><i>لہرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="شرما"><i>شرما</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہکلا"><i>ہکلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="آ"><i>آ</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="خیزا"><i>کھیجا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بڑبڑا"><i>بڑبڑا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہچکچا"><i>ہچکچا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چلا"><i>چلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مسکرا"><i>مسکرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اترا"><i>اترا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹھنڈا"><i>ٹھنڈا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھا"><i>کھا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹرا"><i>ٹرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چرمرا"><i>چرمرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کمہلا"><i>کمہلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھا"><i>چھا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سنسنا"><i>سنسنا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہڑبڑا"><i>ہڑبڑا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سرسرا"><i>سرسرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لبلبا"><i>لبلبا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ککیا"><i>ککیا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="تھر تھرا"><i>تھر تھرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہکلا"><i>ہکلا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سرسرا"><i>سرسرا</i><par n="آ__vblex_iv"/></e>
